Idaho, session 2026, S1354.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 55-3212, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-3212. INTERNAL PROHIBITED CONDUCT -- RESTRICTIONS ON ACCESSORY
DWELLING UNITS. (1) No covenant, condition, or restriction may be added,
amended, or enforced by a homeowner's association or any other parties in
such a way that strictly prohibits internal accessory dwelling units, as
defined in subsection (3) of this section. The provisions of this section
shall not be construed to protect more than one (1) internal accessory
dwelling unit per homestead. No homeowner's association shall add, amend,
or enforce any covenant, condition, or restriction in such a way that limits
or prohibits accessory dwelling units, as defined in section 67-6541, Idaho
Code, on any property, land, or structure thereon within the jurisdiction
of a homeowner's association, unless the owner of the affected property
expressly agrees in writing to such addition or amendment of a covenant,
condition, or restriction. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prevent the enforcement of valid covenants, conditions, or restrictions
limiting or prohibiting a property owner's right to transfer an interest
in land or the structures thereon where such covenant, condition, or re-
striction existed and applied to the property at the time the property owner
acquired an interest in the property.
(2) Notwithstanding the prohibitions provided in subsection (1) of
this section, a homeowner's association may adopt reasonable rules govern-
ing the use of internal accessory dwelling units otherwise allowed by law,
including but not limited to architectural design consistent with the pri-
mary dwelling, size limits, height limits, setback requirements, open space
requirements, parking controls, and bedroom requirements.
(3)(a) An "internal accessory dwelling unit" means a self-contained
living unit that:
(i) Includes its own cooking, sleeping, and sanitation facili-
ties;
(ii) Is located within a detached, owner-occupied homestead, as
defined in section 63-701, Idaho Code, or such homestead's at-
tached or detached garage; and


(iii) Is used for the purpose of housing relatives of the owner of
the homestead or for the purpose of renting to a residential tenant
for a period exceeding thirty (30) days.
(b) An internal accessory dwelling unit does not include an alternative
detached structure, motor home, camper, recreational vehicle, tiny
home on wheels, or other such similar dwellings on wheels.
(4) (3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict a home-
owner's association from adopting a less restrictive definition of acces-
sory dwelling units.
(5) (4) The provisions of this section do not apply to any rentals de-
fined in section 63-1803(4), Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 65, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6541, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6541. ACCESSORY DWELLING UNITS. (1) No city shall enact or enforce
any ordinance, rule, regulation, or policy that bans accessory dwelling
units in any residential zoning area within its jurisdiction. An accessory
dwelling unit shall be classified as a residential land use for zoning pur-
poses subject to all applicable zoning requirements. "Accessory dwelling
unit" means a self-contained living unit that includes its own cooking,
sleeping, and sanitation facilities and that is located on the same lot as a
single-family primary dwelling. An accessory dwelling unit may be internal,
attached, or detached but does not include a motorhome, camper, recreational
vehicle, tiny home on wheels, or other such similar dwellings on wheels.
(2) By February 1, 2027, by resolution or ordinance adopted, amended,
or repealed in accordance with the notice and hearing procedures provided
under section 67-6509, Idaho Code, each city governing board shall amend its
comprehensive plan and land use regulations for all land zoned for single-
family residential uses, except for lands falling within an area defined as a
historic district under section 67-4607, Idaho Code, or designated as a his-
toric property pursuant to section 67-4614, Idaho Code, to:
(a) Allow for either one (1) internal accessory dwelling unit within
the single-family dwelling or one (1) detached accessory dwelling unit
per lot in the rear yard or subject to setbacks required of the primary
dwelling;
(b) Prohibit requiring any off-street parking or guest parking for any
accessory dwelling unit unless the principal dwelling unit does not
have off-street parking or the street is not paved and designed or con-
structed for on-street parking or unless the principal dwelling unit is
within one-fourth (1/4) mile of transit, an employment area, or commer-
cial services;
(c) Prohibit imposing impact fees or utility connection fees on acces-
sory dwelling units that are greater than those imposed on other sin-
gle-family dwellings;
(d) Prohibit limiting the size of an accessory dwelling unit to less
than one thousand (1000) square feet or seventy-five percent (75%) of
the size of the primary dwelling;
(e) Prohibit an owner-occupancy requirement for the primary dwelling
or for the accessory dwelling unit;


(f) Prohibit imposing a limit on building height that is less than the
height of an existing single-family primary dwelling on a lot; and
(g) Prohibit restrictions for accessory dwelling units that are more
restrictive than restrictions for single-family dwellings within the
same zoning district with regard to setbacks, lot size, or coverage or
building frontage.
(3) Accessory dwelling unit projects that meet the jurisdiction's es-
tablished land use requirements shall be approved administratively and as a
matter of right, without the need for discretionary approval.
(4) Any approval standards, special conditions, and procedures for ap-
proval adopted by a local government shall be clear and objective and shall
not have the effect, either singularly or cumulatively, of discouraging the
development of accessory dwelling units through unreasonable cost or delay.
(5) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a city from enacting a reg-
ulation, standard, or condition that is less restrictive than the require-
ments of this section.
(6) The provisions of this section shall apply only to cities with a
population greater than ten thousand (10,000).
(7) The provisions of this section shall not supersede state or local
laws that protect public health, safety, and welfare, including:
(a) Building codes, fire safety standards, and flood plain regula-
tions;
(b) Laws regarding water, sewer, storm drainage, road access, and util-
ity services necessary to support the required density;
(c) Laws regarding environmental hazards, aquifer recharge zones,
steep slopes, and critical habitat protections; and
(d) Laws and regulations regarding setback requirements for rights-of-
way and easements.
SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.